Illinois, session 104th, HB452.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Private Business and Vocational Schools Act 5of 2012 is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 426/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Private Business and Vocational Schools Act of 2012.9(Source: P.A. 97-650, eff. 2-1-12.)